Arkansas, session 2025, SB177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-26-607(c)(1)(C), concerning the
education of student artists in body art, is reenacted to ratify the decision
by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission to insert "may have licensure in the
additional fields of body art added by" in order to correct a grammatical
error.
(C) A licensed artist wanting to study additional fields of
body art training may have licensure in the additional fields of body art
added by completing not less than two hundred fifty (250) clock hours of
technical and procedural training in each of the other fields of body art in
which a student artist is to be licensed in no less than an additional four
(4) months after completion and licensure for the initial field of study.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-82-302(9)(A) and (B), concerning
exemptions from licensing for dentists, dental hygienists, and dental
assistants, are amended to read as follows to clarify references:
*LGL005*
01/31/2025 10:30:17 AM LGL005

SB177
(9)(A) The practice of dentistry without compensation for no
more than four (4) consecutive days per calendar year in the State of
Arkansas by a dentist licensed in another state or the District of Columbia
if the dentist has applied for and received a temporary charitable dental
license from the board.
(B) An applicant seeking a temporary charitable dental
license shall submit an application and any application fees required by the
board and:
(i) The name of the supervising dentist who is licensed
in Arkansas;
(ii) The dates and location where the applicant desires
to practice within Arkansas;
(iii) A copy of the applicant's dental license from
another jurisdiction another state or the District of Columbia;
(iv)(a) A letter from the respective dental
licensing entity in the home state of the applicant other state or the
District of Columbia indicating that the applicant is in good standing.
(b) As used in this subdivision (9)(B)(iv), “good
standing” means the individual has an active license without a complaint,
investigation, or action against him or her;
(v) A copy of the malpractice insurance policy covering
the applicant or a certificate of insurance coverage from the underwriting
insurer of the policy; and
(vi) Other pertinent information as determined by the
board.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 17-82-304(b), concerning the licensing of
dentists, is amended to read as follows to repeal obsolete language and
update references:
(b) An applicant: shall:
(1) Shall:
(A)(1) Be at least twenty-one (21) years of age;
(B)(2) Submit upon request proof as required by the board
touching upon age and fitness; and
(C)(3) Have graduated from an American Dental Association-
accredited college of dentistry with the degree of Doctor of Dental Surgery
01/31/2025 10:30:17 AM LGL005

SB177
or Doctor of Dental Medicine; or.
(2) Shall:
(A) Be at least twenty-one (21) years of age;
(B) Have graduated from a college of dentistry in North
America with the degree of Doctor of Dental Surgery, Doctor of Dental
Medicine, or an equivalent degree approved by the board;
(C) Have passed an examination approved by the board and
authorized under § 17-82-303;
(D) Be a resident of the State of Arkansas and the United
States and be in compliance with federal laws of immigration; and
(E) Serve a period of at least one (1) year under a
provisional license issued by the board to foreign graduates and successfully
complete the monitoring requirements as ordered by the board at the time the
provisional license is issued.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 17-83-301 is amended to read as follows to
repeal obsolete language and make a stylistic change:
17-83-301. License required.
Beginning July 4, 1990, no individual shall An individual shall not
practice or offer to practice dietetics within the meaning of this chapter
unless he or she is duly licensed or is a student under the provisions of
this chapter or is otherwise entitled under § 17-83-104 or § 17-83-302.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 17-83-302 is repealed because the section
is obsolete.
17-83-302. Waivers for licensing.
(a) For one (1) year beginning July 3, 1989, the Arkansas Dietetics
Licensing Board shall waive the examination requirement and grant a license
to any person who:
(1) Has received a baccalaureate or postbaccalaureate degree
from a regionally accredited United States college or university with a
program in human nutrition, food and nutrition, dietetics, or food systems
management;
(2) Has completed a planned continuous preprofessional
experience component in dietetic practice of not fewer than nine hundred
(900) hours under the supervision of a registered dietitian or licensed
01/31/2025 10:30:17 AM LGL005

SB177
dietitian; and
(3) Has been employed in the practice of dietetics for at least
three (3) of the last ten (10) years preceding July 3, 1989; or
(4) Is registered with the Commission on Dietetic Registration.
(b) Applicants who have obtained their education outside of the United
States and its territories must have their academic degree or degrees
validated as equivalent to the baccalaureate or postbaccalaureate degree
conferred by a regionally accredited college or university in the United
States.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 17-87-101(a), concerning the licensing of
nurses, is amended to read as follows to correct a grammatical error:
(a) In order to safeguard life and health, a person practicing or
offering to practice nursing as listed in this subsection for compensation
shall be required to submit evidence that he or she is qualified to so
practice and shall be licensed as provided in this chapter:
(1) Professional nursing;
(2) Advanced practice registered nursing;
(3) Registered practitioner nursing;
(4) Practical nursing; or
(5) Psychiatric technician nursing.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 17-87-104(a), concerning penalties related
to the licensing of nurses, is amended to read as follows to clarify a
criminal offense:
(a)(1) It shall be a misdemeanor is unlawful for any person to:
(A) Sell or fraudulently obtain or furnish any nursing
diploma, license, renewal, or record, or aid or abet therein;
(B) Practice nursing as defined by this chapter under cover
of any diploma, license, or record illegally or fraudulently obtained or
signed or issued unlawfully or under fraudulent representation;
(C) Practice professional nursing, advanced practice
nursing, registered nurse practitioner nursing, practical nursing, or
psychiatric technician nursing as defined by this chapter unless licensed by
the Arkansas State Board of Nursing to do so;
(D) Use in connection with his or her name any of the
01/31/2025 10:30:17 AM LGL005

SB177
following titles, names, or initials, if the user is not properly licensed
under this chapter:
(i) Nurse;
(ii) Registered nurse or R.N.;
(iii) Advanced practice nurse, advanced practice
registered nurse, A.P.N., or A.P.R.N., or any of the following:
(a) Advanced registered nurse practitioner,
certified nurse practitioner, A.R.N.P., A.N.P., or C.N.P.;
(b) Nurse anesthetist, certified nurse
anesthetist, certified registered nurse anesthetist, or C.R.N.A.;
(c) Nurse midwife, certified nurse midwife,
licensed nurse midwife, C.N.M., or L.N.M.; or
(d) Clinical nurse specialist or C.N.S.;
(iv) Registered nurse practitioner, N.P., or R.N.P.;
(v) Licensed practical nurse, practical nurse, or
L.P.N.;
(vi) Licensed psychiatric technician nurse, psychiatric
technician nurse, L.P.T.N., or P.T.N.; or
(vii) Any other name, title, or initials that would
cause a reasonable person to believe the user is licensed under this chapter;
(E) Practice professional nursing, advanced practice
nursing, registered nurse practitioner nursing, practical nursing, or
psychiatric technician nursing during the time his or her license shall be
suspended;
(F) Conduct a nursing education program for the preparation
of professional nurses, advanced practice registered nurses, nurse
practitioners, practical nurses, or psychiatric technician nurses unless the
program has been approved by the board;
(G) Prescribe any drug or medicine as authorized by this
chapter unless certified by the board as having prescriptive authority,
except that a certified registered nurse anesthetist shall not be required to
have prescriptive authority to provide anesthesia care, including the
administration of drugs or medicines necessary for the care; or
(H) Otherwise violate any provisions of this chapter.
(2) Such misdemeanor shall be A first offense under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section is a violation punishable by a fine of not less than
01/31/2025 10:30:17 AM LGL005

SB177
twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500). Each
subsequent offense shall be under subdivision (a)(1) of this section is an
unclassified misdemeanor punishable by fine or by imprisonment of not more
than thirty (30) days, or by both fine and imprisonment.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 17-87-604 is amended to read as follows to
repeal obsolete language and make a stylistic change:
17-87-604. Effective date.
(a) The effective date of this Compact shall be is July 1, 2000.
(b) Upon the effective date of this compact, the licensing board shall
participate in an evaluation of the effectiveness and operability of the
compact. Upon completion of the evaluation, a report shall be submitted to
the Legislative Council for its review.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 17-87-708(a), concerning penalties related
to medication assistive persons, is amended to read as follows to clarify a
criminal offense:
(a)(1) It shall be a misdemeanor is unlawful for any person to:
(A) Sell or fraudulently obtain or furnish any medication
assistive person's certificate, renewal, or record or aid or abet in any such
sale or fraud;
(B) Serve as a medication assistive person under cover of
any certificate or record illegally or fraudulently obtained or signed or
issued unlawfully or under fraudulent representation;
(C) Serve as a medication assistive person unless certified
by the Arkansas State Board of Nursing;
(D) Use in connection with his or her name any of the
following titles, names, or initials if the user is not properly certified
under this subchapter:
(i) Medication assistive person;
(ii) M.A.P.;
(iii) Medication aide;
(iv) Medication technician;
(v) Medication assistant;
(vi) Certified medication aide;
(vii) C.M.A.;
01/31/2025 10:30:17 AM LGL005

SB177
(viii) Medication assistant – Certified;
(ix) MA – C; or
(x) Any other name, title, or initials that would cause
a reasonable person to believe the user is certified under this subchapter;
(E) Serve as a medication assistive person during the time
his or her certification is suspended;
(F) Conduct an education program for the preparation of
medication assistive persons unless the program has been approved by the
board; or
(G) Otherwise violate any provisions of this subchapter.
(2)(A) A misdemeanor A first offense under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section shall be is a violation punishable by a fine of not less than
twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or more than five hundred dollars ($500).
(B) Each subsequent offense under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section shall be is a Class C misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more
than five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment of not more than thirty
(30) days, or by both a fine and imprisonment.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 17-89-203(a)(3), concerning meetings and
officers of the Arkansas Board of Dispensing Opticians, is amended to read as
follows to correct an obsolete reference:
(3) Compile and maintain a book of licensure and a book of
registry of all dispensing opticians who are licensed or registered to engage
in the business of ophthalmic dispensing in the State of Arkansas, which
shall be updated annually. The Arkansas Board of Dispensing Opticians shall
annually furnish a copy of the books to the State Board of Optometry and the
Ophthalmology Section of the Arkansas Medical Society, Inc. Arkansas
Ophthalmological Society;

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 17-89-203(a)(5), concerning the powers and
duties of the Arkansas Board of Dispensing Opticians, is amended to read as
follows to correct an obsolete reference:
(5) Prepare and present an annual report of administration,
licensure, registry, and investigation to the State Board of Optometry and to
the Ophthalmology Section of the Arkansas Medical Society, Inc. Arkansas
Ophthalmological Society;
01/31/2025 10:30:17 AM LGL005

SB177

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 17-90-201 is amended to read as follows to
clarify the section:
17-90-201. Appointment of members.
(a) The State Board of Optometry shall consist of seven (7) members
appointed by the Governor as follows for terms of five (5) years subject to
confirmation by the Senate for terms of five (5) years:
(1) After consulting The Arkansas Optometric Association, Inc.,
the Governor shall appoint five (5) members who are licensed optometrists and
who have been engaged in the regular practice of optometry in this state for
a period of three (3) years; and
(2) Two The Governor shall appoint two (2) members from the
state at large who shall not be actively engaged in or retired from the
profession of optometry. One (1) member appointed under this subdivision
(a)(2) shall represent consumers, and one (1) member appointed under this
subdivision (a)(2) shall be sixty (60) years of age or older and shall
represent the elderly. Both shall be appointed from the state at large,
subject to confirmation by the Senate. The two (2) positions under this
subdivision (a)(2) may not be held by the same person. Both members appointed
under this subdivision (a)(2) shall be full voting members but shall not
participate in the grading of examinations.
(b) All vacancies on the board shall be filled in a like the same
manner as an appointment under subsection (a) of this section.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 17-92-206(a), concerning the issuance of
bulletins by the Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy, is amended to read as
follows to repeal an obsolete reference and make stylistic changes:
(a) It shall be the duty of the The Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy
to shall issue bulletins from time to time, informing pharmacists of
important United States public health regulations, service and regulatory
announcements of the United States Natural Resources Conservation Service,
and decisions of the United States Department of the Treasury relating to the
possession, use, and sale of nonbeverage United States Pharmacopoeia alcohol
and to the Harrison-Wright Antinarcotic Act.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 17-92-301 is amended to read as follows to
01/31/2025 10:30:17 AM LGL005

SB177
clarify references and make stylistic changes:
17-92-301. License required.
(a) No person shall A person shall not perform any of the acts
constituting the practice of pharmacy unless the person is:
(1) A licensed pharmacist;
(2) A student or graduate of a recognized college of pharmacy
serving an internship under an internship program established and regulated
by the Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy;
(3) A pharmacy technician performing the limited functions
permitted under this chapter and rules promulgated hereunder under this
chapter; or
(4) A hospital pharmacy technician as defined in § 17-92-602
performing the limited functions permitted under that subchapter the Hospital
Pharmacies Act, § 17-92-601 et seq., and rules promulgated thereunder under
the Hospital Pharmacies Act, § 17-92-601 et. seq.
(b) No A person other than a licensed pharmacist shall not use the
term “doctor of pharmacy” or “Pharm.D”.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 17-92-302(a) and (b), concerning penalties
for the unlicensed practice of pharmacy, are amended to read as follows to
clarify references, clarify a criminal offense, and make stylistic changes:
(a) No A person shall not fill a prescription, compound medicines, or
otherwise perform the function of a licensed pharmacist unless the person is:
(1) An Arkansas-licensed pharmacist, except students or graduates
of a recognized college of pharmacy serving an internship as provided by law
and regulated by the Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy;
(2) A pharmacy technician performing the limited functions
permitted under this chapter and rules promulgated hereunder under this
chapter; or
(3) A hospital pharmacy technician as defined in § 17-92-602
performing the limited functions permitted under that subchapter the Hospital
Pharmacies Act, § 17-92-601 et seq., and rules promulgated thereunder under
the Hospital Pharmacies Act, § 17-92-601 et seq.
(b) Any person who is not an Arkansas-licensed pharmacist or a student
serving internship or a pharmacy technician performing the limited functions
permitted under this chapter and rules promulgated hereunder or a hospital
01/31/2025 10:30:17 AM LGL005

SB177
pharmacy technician as defined in § 17-92-602 performing the limited
functions permitted under that subchapter and rules promulgated thereunder,
who shall fill a prescription, compound or dispense medicine, or otherwise
perform the functions of a pharmacist, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor A
violation of subsection (a) of this section is a violation punishable by a
fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred
dollars ($100) for the first offense and an unclassified misdemeanor
punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or thirty
(30) days' imprisonment, or both fine and imprisonment, for each succeeding
subsequent offense thereafter.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 17-92-308(c)(1), concerning reciprocity
for the practice of pharmacy, is amended to read as follows to clarify a
reference to the defined term "practice of pharmacy":
(c)(1) In the interim between sessions of the board and upon
satisfactory evidence of the fitness as established by board rule of an
applicant for reciprocity, any member of the board, in his or her discretion,
may issue a temporary certificate that shall authorize the holder to engage
in the practice of pharmacy as defined in § 17-92-101.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 17-92-312 is amended to read as follows:
17-92-312. Revocation and fine — Adulteration of drugs.
Any licensed pharmacist who shall knowingly, intentionally, and
fraudulently adulterate or cause to be adulterated any drugs, chemicals, or
medical preparations and offer such offers the adulterations for sale shall
be deemed upon conviction is guilty of a misdemeanor. Upon conviction, his or
her license shall be revoked and, in addition, he or she shall be liable to a
penalty violation punishable by a fine of not less than five dollars ($5.00)
nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) and shall have his or her license
under this chapter revoked.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 17-93-502 is amended to read as follows to
repeal obsolete language:
17-93-502. Administration of compact — Rules.
(a) The Arkansas State Board of Physical Therapy is the Physical
Therapy Licensure Compact administrator for this state.
01/31/2025 10:30:17 AM LGL005

SB177
(b)(1) The board may adopt rules necessary to implement this
subchapter.
(2)(A) When adopting the initial rules to implement this
subchapter, the final rule shall be filed with the Secretary of State for
adoption under § 25-15-204(f):
(i) On or before January 1, 2020; or
(ii) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by
January 1, 2020, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.
(B) The board shall file the proposed rule with the
Legislative Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1,
2020, so that the Legislative Council may consider the rule for approval
before January 1, 2020.
(c) The board is not required to adopt the rules of the Physical
Therapy Compact Commission.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 17-95-108(b)(1), concerning the informed
consent required for gastric bypass surgery, is amended to read as follows to
repeal obsolete language:
(b)(1) The Arkansas State Medical Board shall promulgate rules to
enforce this section within six (6) months of July 16, 2003.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 17-95-209 is amended to read as follows to
repeal obsolete language:
17-95-209. Regulation of office-based surgery.
Within eighteen (18) months after August 16, 2013, the The Arkansas
State Medical Board shall adopt rules to be followed by a physician who
performs office-based surgery.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 17-95-304(f), concerning inspectors and
use of prescriptions, orders, or records under the Arkansas Medical Practices
Act, is amended to read as follows to clarify a reference to a state board
and make stylistic changes:
(f)(1) The division shall have the authority to may collect from the
individual board Arkansas State Medical Board for utilizing the services
delineated in this section:
(1) up Up to fifty dollars ($50.00) per hour with a maximum of
01/31/2025 10:30:17 AM LGL005

SB177
four thousand dollars ($4,000) in hourly costs per case.;
(2) The division shall also have the authority to collect from
the individual board utilizing the services delineated in this section for:
(A) Travel expenses at the level for state employees; and
(B)(3) Other out-of-pocket costs incurred by the division in
carrying out its investigative task.

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 17-95-306(a)(1), concerning criminal
background checks under the Arkansas Medical Practices Act, is amended to
read as follows to repeal obsolete language:
(a)(1) Beginning July 1, 2005, every Every person applying for a
license or renewal of a license issued by the Arkansas State Medical Board
shall provide written authorization to the board to allow the Division of
Arkansas State Police to release the results of a state and federal criminal
history background check report to the board.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 17-96-103(c), concerning unlawful acts and
penalties related to podiatric medicine, is amended to read as follows to
clarify a criminal offense and make stylistic changes:
(c) Any person who shall knowingly violate any of the provisions of
violates this chapter, upon conviction is guilty of an unclassified
misdemeanor and shall be fined a sum not exceeding one thousand dollars
($1,000) or be imprisoned in the county jail not to exceed thirty (30) days,
or be both fined and imprisoned.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 17-96-201 is amended to read as follows to
formally create a state board, clarify references, and make stylistic
changes:
17-96-201. Creation — Members.
(a) There is created the Arkansas Board of Podiatric Medicine.
(a)(1)(b)(1) The Governor shall appoint an examining board to consist
of board shall consist of five (5) members appointed by the Governor on
September 1, for terms of three (3) years. All members shall be residents of
the state for a period of one (1) or more years.
(2) Three (3) members shall be podiatrists and shall have been
actually engaged in the practice of podiatric medicine immediately preceding
01/31/2025 10:30:17 AM LGL005

SB177
their appointment. They shall be appointed after consulting the Arkansas
Podiatric Medical Association and subject to confirmation by the Senate.
(3) Two (2) members of the Arkansas Board of Podiatric Medicine
board shall not be actively engaged in or retired from the profession of
podiatric medicine. One (1) member under this subdivision (b)(3) shall
represent consumers, and one (1) member under this subdivision (b)(3) shall
be sixty (60) years of age or older and shall represent the elderly. Both
members under this subdivision (b)(3) shall be appointed from the state at
large subject to confirmation by the Senate. The two (2) positions under this
subdivision (b)(3) may not be held by the same person. Both members under
this subdivision (b)(3) shall be full voting members but shall not
participate in the grading of examinations.
(b) All vacancies on the board shall be filled by the Governor to
serve for the unexpired term of the member whose place is rendered vacant.

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 17-96-301(b)(2), concerning the license
required for podiatric medicine and the penalty for unlawful practice of
podiatric medicine, is amended to read as follows to clarify a criminal
offense, repeal redundant language, and make a stylistic change:
(2) Upon conviction, the person shall be is guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor an unclassified misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than one
hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or
imprisoned for not less than three (3) months nor more than one (1) year, or
both. The fine and imprisonment are to be at the discretion of the court or
jury.

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 17-97-201(a)(3)-(5), concerning the
creation and members of the Arkansas Psychology Board, are amended to read as
follows to add clarifying language and repeal obsolete language:
(3)(A) The academic psychologist member, the practicing
psychologist members, and the psychological examiner members shall be
appointed by the Governor after consulting the Arkansas Psychological
Association, Inc., and the Arkansas Association of Masters in Psychology,
Inc., and subject to confirmation by the Senate.
(B)(i) Of the two (2) members appointed pursuant to
subdivision (a)(2)(D) of this section, one (1) member shall represent
01/31/2025 10:30:17 AM LGL005

SB177
consumers, and one (1) member shall be sixty (60) years of age or older and
shall represent the elderly.
(ii) Both shall be appointed from the state at large,
subject to confirmation by the Senate.
(iii) The two (2) positions may not be held by the same
person.
(iv) Both shall be full voting members but shall not
vote on or participate in the administration or grading of examinations of
applicants for licensure.
(C)(i) Any public member appointed under subdivision
(a)(2)(D) of this section after July 28, 1995, shall be an Arkansas resident
and shall have resided in Arkansas for at least five (5) years immediately
preceding appointment.
(ii) Furthermore, the person shall never have been a
psychologist or psychological examiner, an applicant or former applicant for
licensure as a psychologist or psychological examiner, a member of another
mental health profession, a member of a household that includes a
psychologist or psychological examiner, or otherwise have conflicts of
interest or the appearance of conflicts with his or her duties as a board
member.
(4)(A) Each psychologist and psychological examiner appointed to
the board after July 28, 1995, shall reside within the State of Arkansas,
hold a current valid license to practice, and shall have been licensed to
practice psychology in Arkansas for at least five (5) years immediately
preceding his or her appointment to the board.
(B) At the time of appointment, each such member shall be
free of any conflict of interest and the appearance of any conflict with his
or her duties as a member of the board.
(C) To the extent possible, psychologist and psychological
examiner board members shall be members or fellows of state or national
professional organizations, such as the Arkansas Psychological Association,
Inc., the Arkansas Association of Masters in Psychology, Inc., or the
American Psychological Association.
(5)(A) The Governor shall fill all vacancies on the board for the
unexpired term within thirty (30) days after the vacancy occurs.
(B) The Governor shall remove any member from the board if
01/31/2025 10:30:17 AM LGL005

SB177
he or she:
(i) Ceases to be qualified;
(ii) Fails to attend three (3) successive board
meetings without just cause as determined by the board;
(iii) Is found to be in violation of this chapter;
(iv) Pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is found
guilty of a felony listed under § 17-3-102 by a court of competent
jurisdiction; or
(v) Pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is found
guilty of malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in relation to his or her
board duties by a court of competent jurisdiction.

SECTION 27. Arkansas Code § 17-97-201(b), concerning the creation and
members of the Arkansas Psychology Board, is repealed to remove redundant and
obsolete language.
(b) All vacancies occurring on the board shall be filled by the
Governor for the unexpired term and, for the professional members from the
list of those qualified, within thirty (30) days after the vacancy occurs.

SECTION 28. Arkansas Code § 17-97-310(b), concerning the denial or
revocation of a license to practice psychology, is amended to read as follows
to clarify the denial of issuance or revocation of a license by the Arkansas
Psychology Board due to a criminal offense for consistency with §§ 17-3-102
and 17-97-312:
(b) The When determining whether to deny issuance of or revoke a
license due to a criminal offense, the board shall refuse to issue or shall
revoke the license of any person who has been found guilty of or pleaded
guilty or nolo contendere to any of the offenses listed in § 17-97-312(f)
unless the person requests and the board grants a waiver pursuant to § 17-97-
312(h) follow § 17-3-102.

SECTION 29. Arkansas Code § 17-100-208(a), concerning outside
investigators contracted by the Board of Examiners in Speech-Language
Pathology and Audiology, is amended to read as follows to clarify its
application:
(a)(1) The Board of Examiners in Speech-Language Pathology and
01/31/2025 10:30:17 AM LGL005

SB177
Audiology shall contract with an outside investigator as needed to perform
investigations and conduct inspections of alleged wrongdoing.
(2) An outside investigator contacted contracted with under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall have expertise or background in the
subject matter in which he or she is being contracted to investigate.

SECTION 30. Arkansas Code § 17-101-315 is amended to read as follows
to repeal obsolete language and make stylistic changes:
17-101-315. Equine teeth floating.
(a) The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission is prohibited from
enforcing commission policy regarding equine teeth floating by either
investigating or prosecuting an individual practitioner engaged in equine
teeth floating until July 1, 2013.
(b)(1) Before engaging in the practice of equine teeth floating in the
state, an individual practitioner shall present to the commission Arkansas
Livestock and Poultry Commission signed letters of recommendation from two
(2) clients who have previously employed the individual practitioner and who
bear witness to the individual practitioner's ability to perform equine teeth
floating.
(2)(b) The letters of recommendation under subsection (a) of
this section shall be presented to the commission before providing service to
a client or performing any procedure on any animal.

SECTION 31. Arkansas Code § 17-101-316(a) and (b), concerning
livestock embryo transfer or transplant and livestock pregnancy
determination, are amended to read as follows to repeal obsolete language and
make stylistic changes:
(a) Until July 1, 2019, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
is prohibited from investigating or prosecuting under a commission rule or
policy an individual technician who engages in both:
(1) Livestock embryo transfer or transplant; and
(2) Livestock pregnancy determination.
(b) Before engaging in livestock embryo transfer or transplant and
livestock pregnancy determination in the state, an individual technician
shall obtain a certification from the commission Arkansas Livestock and
Poultry Commission.
01/31/2025 10:30:17 AM LGL005

SB177

SECTION 32. Arkansas Code § 17-102-104(a), concerning false
advertising under the Arkansas Acupuncture Practices Act, is amended to read
as follows to clarify a reference to a defined term:
(a) A person defined in § 17-102-102(4) An acupuncturist shall not
solicit for patronage or advertise for patronage by any means whatever that
are misleading, fraudulent, deceptive, or dishonest.

SECTION 33. Arkansas Code § 17-102-201(a)(5)(A) and (B), concerning
the Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques, is amended to
read as follows to repeal obsolete language and correct a reference to a
state legislative committee:
(5)(A) On a biennial basis beginning in October 2010, the board
shall file a written report with the House Committee on Public Heath Health,
Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor.
(B) The report shall contain a certified copy of the minutes
of all board meetings as required by § 17-102-205 for the calendar years 2009
through October 2010 and thereafter covering the period of time since the
last report.

SECTION 34. Arkansas Code § 17-102-204(a), concerning the Arkansas
State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques, is amended to read as
follows to repeal obsolete language and make stylistic changes:
(a) The Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques
shall within sixty (60) days of August 1, 1997, and every May thereafter hold
a meeting in May each year and elect from its the board's membership a
president, a secretary, and a treasurer for terms set by the board.

SECTION 35. Arkansas Code § 17-102-206(b)(5)(B) and (C), concerning
the powers and duties of the Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related
Techniques, are amended to read as follows to repeal obsolete language:
(B) Within thirty (30) days after July 31, 2009, the
Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques shall promulgate
new rules to replace the following existing rules: Title I, Title II, Title
III, Title IV, Title V, and Title VI.
01/31/2025 10:30:17 AM LGL005

SB177
(C) All proposed rules after July 31, 2009, shall be
approved in writing by the Arkansas State Medical Board under the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., but before submission to
the Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council;

SECTION 36. DO NOT CODIFY. CONSTRUCTION AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly
or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly;
(2) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the
regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(A) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General
Assembly for the purposes of:
(i) Giving the act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(ii) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of
the Arkansas Code of 1987; and
(B) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and
(3) This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes
to the Arkansas Code of 1987.














01/31/2025 10:30:17 AM LGL005